Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-105.2 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 2190 Page 1


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Sexual Education Reform and Parental Rights Protection Act”.


B. As used in this act:


1. “Comprehensive sexual education” or “sexual risk reduction”


means any educational program that includes, endorses, or promotes


any of the following:


a. the advocacy of sexual activity outside of marriage,


b. the advocacy or promotion of any form of sexual


activity that deviates from the understanding of


sexual norms within a traditional family structure,


c. the provision of information about contraceptive


methods without emphasizing their potential risks and


failure rates,


d. the endorsement or promotion of non-heterosexual


orientations as equally valid or preferable to


heterosexual orientations,


e. the teaching of explicit sexual techniques without a


focus on abstinence as the preferred choice,


f. the inclusion of materials that may be considered


obscene or harmful to minors,


g. the teaching of gender identity and gender expression


outside the binary concept of male and female, without


emphasizing the biological basis of sex,


h. a rights-based, pleasure-based sexual response system,

Req. No. 2190 Page 2


i. the teaching of consent and negotiation skills for


sexual activity,


j. sexually transmitted infections (STIs) presented as


normal or common,


k. instruction segmented for students of a different


sexual orientation and gender identity,


l. abortion presented as a safe, reproductive health care


choice and a right, and


m. the undermining of the parent relationship, knowledge,


and relevancy with students encouraged to seek other


help; and


2. “Optimal sexual health education” or “sexual risk avoidance”


means an educational program that emphasizes the following:


a. the importance of monogamous, heterosexual


relationships within the context of marriage,


b. the benefits of abstaining from sexual activity,


c. the physical, psychological, and emotional risks and


consequences of engaging in premarital sexual


activity,


d. the importance of personal responsibility and self-


discipline,


e. the positive aspects of healthy relationships


including communication skills, mutual respect, and


emotional intimacy,

Req. No. 2190 Page 3


f. the development of decision-making skills and setting


personal boundaries,


g. the understanding of the potential social, emotional,


and physical consequences of early sexual activity,


h. a science-based, health-based information about the


reproductive system,


i. refusal and resistance skills for sexual avoidance,


j. that sexually transmitted infections (STIs) can cause


serious health concerns and can and should be avoided,


k. information provided and risk avoidance promoted for


all students, regardless of sexual orientation or


gender identity,


l. that abortion, if discussed, is presented in the


context of state law and physical and emotional risks,


and


m. that parental involvement, communication, and


authority are upheld and family values are supported.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 2003, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2003. A. The board of education of a school district,


in consultation with parents, teachers, and administrators, shall


develop and adopt a policy to promote the involvement of parents and


guardians of children enrolled in the schools within the school


district, including:

Req. No. 2190 Page 4


1. A plan for parent participation in the schools which is


designed to improve parent and teacher cooperation in such areas as


homework, attendance, and discipline;


2. Procedures by which parents may learn about the course of


study for their children and review learning materials, including


the source of any supplemental educational materials;


3. Procedures by which parents who object to any learning


material or activity on the basis that it is harmful may withdraw


their children from the activity or from the class or program in


which the material is used. Objection to a learning material or


activity on the basis that it is harmful includes objection to a


material or activity because it questions beliefs or practices in


sex, morality, or religion;


4. If a school district offers any sex education curricula


pursuant to Section 11-105.1 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes or


pursuant to any rules adopted by the State Board of Education,


procedures to opt out of a school district from providing sex


education require written consent from a parent for a child to


participate in comprehensive sexual education or sexual risk


reduction instruction to a child if the child’s parent provides


written objection to the child’s participation in the sex education


curricula or optimal sexual health education or sexual risk


avoidance instruction, as defined in Section 1 of this act;



Req. No. 2190 Page 5


5. Procedures by which parents will be notified in advance of


and given the opportunity to withdraw their children from provide


written consent for a child to participate in any instruction or


presentations regarding sexuality in courses other than formal sex


comprehensive sexual education or sexual risk reduction curricula or


optimal sexual health education or sexual risk avoidance curricula


pursuant to Section 11-105.1 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. Procedures by which parents may learn about the nature and


purpose of clubs and activities that are part of the school


curriculum, as well as extracurricular clubs and activities that


have been approved by the school; and


7. Procedures by which parents may learn about parental rights


and responsibilities under the laws of this state, including the


following:


a. the right to opt out of in to a sex comprehensive


sexual education or sexual risk reduction curriculum


or an optimal sexual health education or sexual risk


avoidance curriculum if one such a course or courses


is provided by the school district,


b. open enrollment rights,


c. the right to opt out of assignments pursuant to this


section,





Req. No. 2190 Page 6


d. the right to be exempt from the immunization laws of


the state pursuant to Section 1210.192 of Title 70 of


the Oklahoma Statutes,


e. the promotion requirements prescribed in Section


1210.508E of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes


provisions of the Strong Readers Act,


f. the minimum course of study and competency


requirements for graduation from high school


prescribed in Section 11-103.6 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes,


g. the right to opt out of instruction on the acquired


immune deficiency syndrome pursuant to Section 11-


103.3 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


h. the right to review test results,


i. the right to participate in gifted programs pursuant


to Sections 1210.301 through 1210.308 of Title 70 of


the Oklahoma Statutes,


j. the right to inspect instructional materials used in


connection with any research or experimentation


program or project pursuant to Section 11-106 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes,


k. the right to receive a school report card,


l. the attendance requirements prescribed in Section 10-


106 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,

Req. No. 2190 Page 7


m. the right to public review of courses of study and


textbooks,


n. the right to be excused from school attendance for


religious purposes,


o. policies related to parental involvement pursuant to


this section,


p. the right to participate in parent-teacher


associations and organizations that are sanctioned by


the board of education of a school district, and


q. the right to opt out of any data collection instrument


at the district level that would capture data for


inclusion in the state longitudinal student data


system except what is necessary and essential for


establishing a student’s public school record.


B. The board of education of a school district may adopt a


policy to provide to parents the information required by this


section in an electronic form.


C. A parent shall submit a written request for information


pursuant to this section during regular business hours to either the


school principal at the school site or the superintendent of the


school district at the office of the school district. Within ten


(10) days of receiving the request for information, the school


principal or the superintendent of the school district shall either


deliver the requested information to the parent or submit to the

Req. No. 2190 Page 8


parent a written explanation of the reasons for the denial of the


requested information. If the request for information is denied or


the parent does not receive the requested information within fifteen


(15) days after submitting the request for information, the parent


may submit a written request for the information to the board of


education of a school district, which shall formally consider the


request at the next scheduled public meeting of the board if the


request can be properly noticed on the agenda. If the request


cannot be properly noticed on the agenda, the board of education of


a school district shall formally consider the request at the next


subsequent public meeting of the board.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-105.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 11-105.1. A. All curriculum and materials including


supplementary materials which will be used to teach or will be used


for or in connection with a sex comprehensive sexual education or


sexual risk reduction class or program which is designed for the


exclusive purpose of discussing sexual behavior or attitudes or an


optimal sexual health education or sexual risk avoidance class or


program, as defined in Section 1 of this act, or any test, survey or


questionnaire whose primary purpose is to elicit responses on sexual


behavior or attitudes shall be available on the school district’s


website and through the superintendent or a designee of the school


district for inspection by parents and legal guardians of the

Req. No. 2190 Page 9


student who will be involved with the class, program or, test,


survey, or questionnaire. Such curriculum, materials, classes,


programs, tests, surveys, or questionnaires shall include


information about consent and shall have as one of its primary


purposes the teaching of or informing students about the practice of


abstinence. For the purposes of this section, “consent” shall have


the same meaning as that provided by Section 113 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. The superintendent or a designee of the school


district shall provide prior written notification to the parents or


legal guardians of the students involved of their right to inspect


the curriculum and material, the right to inspect a detailed outline


of the curriculum, and of their obligation to notify the right of


parents or legal guardians to provide the school in writing written


consent if they do not want their child to participate in the class,


program, test, survey, or questionnaire. Each local board of


education shall determine the means of providing written


notification to the parents and guardian legal guardians which will


ensure effective notice in an efficient and appropriate manner


including a reasonable time period for the parent or legal guardian


to review the curriculum. No student shall be required to


participate in a sex comprehensive sexual education or sexual risk


reduction class or program or an optimal sexual health education or


sexual risk avoidance class or program which discusses sexual


behavior or attitudes if a parent or legal guardian of the student

Req. No. 2190 Page 10


objects in writing to does not provide written consent for such


participation. If the type of program referred to in this section


is a part of or is taught during a credit course, a student may be


required to enroll in the course but shall not be required to


receive instruction in or participate in the program if a parent or


legal guardian objects in writing does not provide written consent.


B. The superintendent or a designee of a school district in


which sex a comprehensive sexual education or sexual risk reduction


class or program or an optimal sexual health education or sexual


risk avoidance class or program is taught or a program is offered


which is designed for the exclusive purpose of discussing sexual


behavior or attitudes shall approve all curriculum and materials


which will be used for such education and any test, survey, or


questionnaire whose primary purpose is to elicit responses on sexual


behavior or attitudes used in the school prior to their use in the


classroom or school. The teacher involved in the class, program,


testing, or survey shall submit the curriculum, materials, tests, or


surveys to the superintendent or a designee for approval prior to


their use in the classroom or school. This section shall not apply


to those students enrolled in classes, programs, testings, or


surveys offered through an alternative education program.


C. A comprehensive sexual education or sexual risk reduction


class or program or an optimal sexual health education or sexual


risk avoidance class or program offered by a school district

Req. No. 2190 Page 11


pursuant to this section shall only be taught by a certified teacher


who is employed by the school district. Outside organizations


including, but not limited to, county health departments and city-


county health departments shall be prohibited from leading such a


class or program.


D. Only textbooks and other instructional materials included in


the list of textbooks selected by the State Textbook Committee


pursuant to Section 16-110 of this title shall be used in a


comprehensive sexual education or sexual risk reduction class or


program or an optimal sexual health education or sexual risk


avoidance class or program offered pursuant to this section. A


school district shall be prohibited from using state funds to


purchase textbooks or other instructional materials not included in


the list of textbooks selected by the State Textbook Committee.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2190 EB 1/15/2026 7:31:07 AM







Req. No. 2190 Page 12